Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.030

Qualifications of voting members.

All voting members must be citizens and residents of this state. Each producer member must be over the age of twenty-five years, and be, and for five years have been, actively engaged in growing soft tree fruits in this state, and deriving a substantial portion of his or her income therefrom, or have a substantial amount of orchard acreage devoted to soft tree fruit production as an owner, lessee, partner, or a stockholder owning at least ten percent of the voting stock in a corporation engaged in the production of soft tree fruit. He or she cannot be engaged directly in business as a dealer. Each dealer member must be actively engaged, either individually or as an executive officer, employee or sales manager on a management level, or managing agent of an organization, as a dealer. Each processor member must be engaged, either individually or as an executive officer, employee on a management level, sales manager, or managing agent of an organization, as a processor. Only one dealer member may be in the employ of any one person or organization engaged in business as a dealer. Only one processor member may be in the employ of any one person or organization engaged in business as a processor. Said qualifications must continue throughout each member's term of office.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6037; 1967 c 191 s 2; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.030. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-12.]